District of Columbia statutes.
47-2311

Tax on fuel sold by United States agency in the District of Columbia.

When under authority of law gasoline or other motor vehicle fuel is sold by an agency of the United States within the District of Columbia, for use in privately-owned vehicles, such agency of the United States shall, by agreement with the Mayor of the District of Columbia, arrange for the collection of the tax herein authorized to be imposed, and for accounting to the Collector of Taxes of the District of Columbia for the proceeds of such tax collections.

Apr. 23, 1924, 43 Stat. 106, ch. 131, § 14
June 4, 1952, 66 Stat. 100, ch. 366, § 2
May 18, 1954, 68 Stat. 117, ch. 218, title XI, § 1102
Sept. 30, 1966, 80 Stat. 858, Pub. L. 89-610, title VII, § 802
Dec. 15, 1971, 85 Stat. 653, Pub. L. 92-196, title III, § 301(d)
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

History

1981 Ed., § 47-2311.
1973 Ed., § 47-1912.

Prior Codifications

Office of Collector of Taxes abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-401.

Editor's Notes